Missouri, session 2026, SB1414.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2 empowered to sell, transfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3 and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4 in property located in Cole County, Missouri, to the City of
5 Jefferson. The property to be conveyed is more particularly
6 described as follows:
7 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
8 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOT 297, AND
9 INLOT 301, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY,
10 MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
11 THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY
12 RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
13 FOLLOWS:
14
15 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297
16 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
17 NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
18 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY
19 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
20 INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,

SB 1414 2
21 N 42°14'53" E, 154.53 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
22 BEGINNING
23
24 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
25 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHWEST
26 LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°50'05" E, 19.74 FEET;
27 THENCE S 42°09'56" W, 158.35 FEET; THENCE S
28 48°23'10" E, 72.95 FEET; THENCE S 41°36'50" W,
29 98.71 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
30 THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE
31 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
32 SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT THE FOLLOWING
33 COURSES: N 48°09'32" W, 78.99 FEET; THENCE N
34 42°24'31" E, 32.97 FEET; THENCE N 64°34'23" W,
35 15.78 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
36 INLOT 301, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST
37 LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK
38 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE
39 WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 301 AND
40 INLOT 297, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
41 TRACT, S 42°14'53" E, 228.38 FEET TO THE POINT
42 OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.27 ACRES MORE OR
43 LESS.
44
45 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
46 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOT 297, INLOT 301,
47 INLOT 302, AND INLOT 303 CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE
48 COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
49 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF
50 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY
51 DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
52

SB 1414 3
53 BEGINNING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297
54 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
55 NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
56 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY
57 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID
58 INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
59 S 48°09'25" E, 79.52 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
60 NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHEAST
61 LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°09'56" W, 275.23 FEET;
62 THENCE S 48°23'09" E, 49.69 FEET; THENCE S
63 09°39'05" W, 150.87 FEET; THENCE S 41°36'50" W,
64 8.27 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTH LINE OF THE
65 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341
66 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
67 SOUTH LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 48°38'41" W, 32.24
68 FEET; THENCE N 48°09'32" W, 84.73 FEET; THENCE
69 LEAVING THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID TRACT, N
70 41°36'50" E, 98.71 FEET; THENCE N 48°23'10" W,
71 72.95 FEET; THENCE N 42°09'56" E, 158.35 FEET;
72 THENCE N 47°50'05" W, 19.74 FEET, TO A POINT ON
73 THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, ALSO BEING A
74 POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
75 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF
76 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
77 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHWEST
78 LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°14'53" E, 154.38 FEET
79 TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.76 ACRE
80 MORE OR LESS.
81
82 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
83 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 431 AND
84 435, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,

SB 1414 4
85 BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
86 BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
87 BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
88
89 BEGINNING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431
90 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
91 NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
92 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
93 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
94 INLOT 431 AND INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE
95 SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°08'00" W,
96 417.44 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT
97 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID
98 TRACT; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT
99 435, AND WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
100 N 47°42'52" W, 28.00 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
101 SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 435 AND SAID TRACT,
102 N 41°53'46" E, 356.78 FEET; THENCE N 21°00'20"
103 E, 44.38 FEET; THENCE N 18°15'25" W, 39.27 FEET
104 TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431,
105 ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF THE
106 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342
107 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
108 NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 431 AND THE
109 NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°42'52" E,
110 79.61 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
111 CONTAINS 0.30 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
112
113 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
114 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 428 THRU 431 AND
115 INLOT 435, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY,
116 MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY

SB 1414 5
117 THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
118 RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
119 FOLLOWS:
120
121 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431
122 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
123 NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
124 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
125 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID
126 INLOT 431 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
127 N 47°42'52" W, 79.61 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
128 BEGINNING:
129
130 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
131 NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431, AND THE NORTHEAST
132 LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 18°15'25" E, 39.27 FEET;
133 THENCE S 21°00'20" W, 44.38 FEET; THENCE S
134 41°53'46" W, 356.78 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
135 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING A POINT
136 ON THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
137 THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
138 RECORDS; THENCE N 47°42'52" E, 38.00 FEET, WITH
139 THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE
140 SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE LEAVING THE
141 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE
142 SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
143 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
144 RECORDS, N 42°09'55" E, 320.16 FEET; THENCE N
145 03°49'48" W, 97.35 FEET; THENCE N 48°11'21" W,
146 120.57 FEET; THENCE N 88°09'33" W, 223.89 TO A
147 POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 428, ALSO
148 BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT

SB 1414 6
149 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF
150 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
151 NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 428, ALSO BEING THE
152 NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05'08" E,
153 167.29 FEET TO THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID
154 INLOT 428 AND THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID
155 TRACT; THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID
156 INLOT 428, 429, 430 AND 431, ALSO BEING THE
157 NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°42'52" E,
158 338.04 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
159 CONTAINS 0.86 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
160
161 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
162 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 AND
163 437, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
164 BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
165 BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
166 BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
167
168 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436
169 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
170 NORTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY
171 THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
172 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
173 INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT
174 2.70, S 42°08'00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST
175 CORNER OF SAID TRACT 2.70, THE POINT OF
176 BEGINNING:
177
178 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
179 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, AND WITH THE
180 SOUTHWEST LINE OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE

SB 1414 7
181 DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
182 RECORDS, WITH A CURVE TO THE RIGHT 2.31 FEET,
183 CURVE RADIUS 13.83 FEET, CHORD S 53°30'25" E,
184 2.31 FEET; THENCE S 48°42'49" E, 103.75 FEET TO
185 THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT 2.70, ALSO
186 BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF THE TRACT
187 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 123 PAGE 284 OF
188 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
189 SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 59°09'35" E,
190 17.29 FEET; THENCE S 48°39'20" E, 33.54 FEET TO
191 THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT, ALSO BEING
192 THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED
193 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353; THENCE WITH
194 THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT S 48°41'47" E,
195 41.38 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
196 SAID TRACT, S 41°38'16" W, 10.46 FEET; THENCE N
197 48°04'58" W, 70.28 FEET; THENCE WITH A CURVE TO
198 THE LEFT 99.14 FEET, CURVE RADIUS 89.00 FEET,
199 CHORD N 79°59'40" W, 94.09 FEET; THENCE S
200 68°05'37" W, 58.04 FEET; THENCE N 21°54'23" W,
201 4.43 FEET; THENCE S 68°05'37" W, 42.59 FEET TO A
202 POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, ALSO
203 BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
204 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF
205 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
206 NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 436 AND THE
207 NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°08'00" E,
208 143.09 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
209 CONTAINS 0.16 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
210
211 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:

SB 1414 8
212 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 THRU 440, CITY
213 OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART
214 OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277
215 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE
216 PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
217
218 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436
219 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
220 NORTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY
221 THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
222 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
223 INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT
224 2.70, S 42°08'00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST
225 CORNER OF SAID TRACT 2.70; THENCE CONTINUING
226 WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 436, S
227 42°08'00" W, 143.09 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
228 BEGINNING:
229
230 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
231 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, N 68°05'37" E,
232 42.59 FEET; THENCE S 21°54'23" W, 4.43 FEET;
233 THENCE N 68°05'37" E, 58.04 FEET; THENCE WITH A
234 CURVE TO THE RIGHT 99.14 FEET, CURVE RADIUS
235 89.00 FEET, CHORD N 79°59'40" E, 94.09 FEET;
236 THENCE S 48°04'58" E, 70.28 FEET; THENCE N
237 41°38'16" E, 10.46 FEET TO A POINT ON THE
238 SOUTHWEST LINE OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED BY THE
239 DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
240 RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
241 TRACTS 2.60, 2.50, 2.40, AND 2.30 AS DESCRIBED
242 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE
243 COUNTY RECORDS, S 48°41'51" E, 135.07 FEET;

SB 1414 9
244 THENCE S 53°55'14" E, 61.87 FEET, TO A POINT ON
245 THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT OF 439, ALSO BEING
246 THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF TRACT 2.30 AS DESCRIBED
247 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE
248 COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE
249 OF INLOT 439, S 48°09'18" E, 22.95 TO THE
250 NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID INLOT 439; THENCE WITH
251 THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 439, S
252 42°08'00" W, 49.40 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
253 SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 439, N 48°21'44" W,
254 277.24 FEET; THENCE S 86°54'06" W, 142.07 FEET;
255 THENCE S 42°09'55" W, 266.70 FEET, TO A POINT ON
256 THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 440; THENCE WITH THE
257 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 440, N 48°09'32" W,
258 40.00 TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID INLOT 440;
259 THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT
260 440, N 42°08'00" E, 261.67 FEET TO THE POINT OF
261 BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
262
263 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
264 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 295 AND
265 296, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
266 BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
267 BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
268 BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
269
270 BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296
271 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
272 SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
273 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
274 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID
275 INLOT 295 AND INLOT 296, ALSO BEING THE

SB 1414 10
276 SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42'52" W,
277 208.34 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT
278 295, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID
279 TRACT; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT
280 295, AND WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
281 N 42°05'08" E, 56.27 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
282 NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 295 AND SAID TRACT,
283 S 48°11'21" E, 149.10 FEET; THENCE S 57°43'36"
284 E, 60.32 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE
285 OF INLOT 296, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
286 SOUTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
287 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
288 RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
289 INLOT 296 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
290 S 42°14'53" W, 68.00 FEET TO THE POINT OF
291 BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.28 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
292
293 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
294 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 292, INLOT 295 AND
295 INLOT 296, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY,
296 MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
297 THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
298 RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
299 FOLLOWS:
300
301 COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296
302 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
303 SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
304 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
305 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
306 INLOT 296 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,

SB 1414 11
307 N 42°14'53" E, 68.00 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
308 BEGINNING:
309
310 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
311 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 296, AND THE SOUTHEAST
312 LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 57°43'36" W, 60.32 FEET;
313 THENCE N 48°11'21" W, 149.10 FEET, TO A POINT ON
314 THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295, ALSO BEING A
315 POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT;
316 THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295 AND
317 THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05'08" E,
318 70.01 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
319 INLOT 295 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
320 S 48°11'45" E, 153.64 FEET; THENCE N 42°09'56"
321 E, 290.35 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE
322 OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
323 NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE
324 NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 292 AND THE NORTHEAST
325 LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°47'48" E, 55.48 FEET,
326 TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING
327 THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH
328 THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 292, AND INLOT
329 296, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
330 TRACT, S 42°14'41" W, 349.75 FEET, TO THE POINT
331 OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
332
333 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
334 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 293 AND
335 294, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
336 BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
337 BOOK 329 PAGE 358 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
338 BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:

SB 1414 12
339
340 BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 294
341 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
342 SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
343 DEED IN BOOK 329 PAGE 358 OF THE COLE COUNTY
344 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID
345 INLOT 294 AND INLOT 293, ALSO BEING THE
346 SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42'52" W,
347 183.54 FEET TO THE INTERSECTION OF THE SOUTHWEST
348 LINE OF INLOTS 293 AND THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF
349 WAY LINE OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD;
350 THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF
351 THE MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD, N 73°49'28" E,
352 64.57 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT
353 OF WAY LINE OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD, S
354 48°11'21" E, 149.57 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
355 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 294, ALSO BEING A POINT
356 ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
357 THE DEED IN BOOK 329 PAGE 358 OF THE COLE COUNTY
358 RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
359 INLOT 294 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
360 S 42°05'08" W, 56.27 FEET TO THE POINT OF
361 BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.21 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
362
363 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
364 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 293 AND
365 294, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
366 BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
367 BOOK 329 PAGE 358 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
368 BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
369

SB 1414 13
370 COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 294
371 OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
372 SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
373 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
374 RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
375 INLOT 294 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
376 N 42°05'08" E, 56.27 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
377 BEGINNING:
378
379 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
380 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 294, AND THE SOUTHEAST
381 LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 48°11'21" W, 149.57 FEET,
382 TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF
383 THE MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD; THENCE WITH THE
384 SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF THE MISSOURI
385 PACIFIC RAILROAD, N 73°49'28" E, 82.56 FEET;
386 THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE
387 OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD, S 48°11'45" E,
388 106.14 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
389 INLOT 294, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST
390 LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST
391 LINE OF INLOT 294 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
392 TRACT, S 42°05'08" W, 70.01 FEET, TO THE POINT
393 OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.21 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
394 2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
395 terms and conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
396 deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
397 but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
398 the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
399 3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
400 instrument of conveyance.
✓